Hawaii statutes.
§443B-4.59 Restoration of forfeited
registration. (a) A forfeited registration may be restored by submitting
an application provided by the director and by paying a delinquent renewal fee
and a restoration fee in the amount specified by rule.

(b) Failure to restore a forfeited
registration within sixty days of forfeiture shall cause the registration to be
terminated.

(c) The director may extend the sixty-day
limitation for good cause shown.

(d) Upon termination of registration, the
collection agency shall cease to do business. [L 1990, c 246, pt of §1; am L
1992, c 202, §61]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next